North Carolina, session 2025, HB985.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 14-33 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-33. Misdemeanor assaults,Assaults, batteries, and affrays, simple and aggravated;
punishments.
…
(c) Unless the conduct is covered under some other provision of law providing greater
punishment, any person who commits any assault, assault and battery, or affray is guilty of a
Class A1 misdemeanor if, in the course of the assault, assault and battery, or affray, he or she:
…
(6) Assaults a school employee or school volunteer when the employee or
volunteer is discharging or attempting to discharge his or her duties as an
employee or volunteer, or assaults a school employee or school volunteer as a
result of the discharge or attempt to discharge that individual's duties as a
school employee or school volunteer. For purposes of this subdivision, the
following definitions shall apply:
a. "Duties" means:
1. All activities on school property;
2. All activities, wherever occurring, during a school authorized
event or the accompanying of students to or from that event;
and
3. All activities relating to the operation of school transportation.
b. "Employee" or "volunteer" means:
1. An employee of a local board of education; or a charter school
authorized under G.S. 115C-218.5, or a nonpublic school
which has filed intent to operate under Part 1 or Part 2 of
Article 39 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes;
2. An independent contractor or an employee of an independent
contractor of a local board of education, charter school
authorized under G.S. 115C-218.5, or a nonpublic school
which has filed intent to operate under Part 1 or Part 2 of
Article 39 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes, if the
*H985-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
independent contractor carries out duties customarily
performed by employees of the school; and
3. An adult who volunteers his or her services or presence at any
school activity and is under the supervision of an individual
listed in sub-sub-subdivision 1. or 2. of this sub-subdivision.
…
(c1) No school personnel as defined in G.S. 14-33(c)(6) who takes reasonable actions in
good faith to end a fight or altercation between students shall incur any civil or criminal liability
as the result of those actions.
(c2) Unless the conduct is covered under some other provision of law providing greater
punishment, any person who commits any assault, assault and battery, or affray is guilty of a
Class I felony if, in the course of the assault, assault and battery, or affray, he or she assaults a
school employee or school volunteer when the employee or volunteer is discharging or
attempting to discharge his or her duties as an employee or volunteer, or assaults a school
employee or school volunteer as a result of the discharge or attempt to discharge that individual's
duties as a school employee or school volunteer. No school personnel who takes reasonable
actions in good faith to end a fight or altercation between students shall incur any civil or criminal
liability as the result of those actions. For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions
apply:
(1) Duties. – Means any of the following:
a. All activities on school property.
b. All activities, wherever occurring, during a school authorized event or
the accompanying of students to or from that event.
c. All activities relating to the operation of school transportation.
(2) Employee or Volunteer. – Means any of the following:
a. An employee of a local board of education; or a charter school
authorized under G.S. 115C-218.5, or a nonpublic school which has
filed intent to operate under Part 1 or Part 2 of Article 39 of Chapter
115C of the General Statutes.
b. An independent contractor or an employee of an independent
contractor of a local board of education, charter school authorized
under G.S. 115C-218.5, or a nonpublic school which has filed intent
to operate under Part 1 or Part 2 of Article 39 of Chapter 115C of the
General Statutes, if the independent contractor carries out duties
customarily performed by employees of the school.
c. An adult who volunteers his or her services or presence at any school
activity and is under the supervision of an individual listed in
sub-subdivision a. or b. of this subdivision.
…."
SECTION 2. G.S. 115C-289.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-289.1. Supervisor duty to report; intimidation of school employee.
(a) When a supervisor of a school employee has actual notice that the school employee
has been the victim of an assault by a student in violation of G.S. 14-33(c)(6)14-33(c2) resulting
in physical injury, as that term is defined in G.S. 14-34.7, the supervisor shall immediately report
to the principal the assault against the school employee. For the purpose of this subsection, the
term "supervisor of a school employee" does not include the principal or superintendent.
(b) A principal, superintendent, or supervisor of a school employee shall not, by threats
or in any other manner, intimidate or attempt to intimidate that school employee from reporting
to law enforcement an assault by a student under G.S. 14-33(c)(6).14-33(c2).
…."
Page 2 House Bill 985-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to offenses
committed on or after that date.
House Bill 985-First Edition Page 3